Utah statutes.
71-7-1.   Veterans not to be buried in ground used for paupers.

The body of a person who dies while in the military service of the United States of America during any period of war, police action, or other period of national emergency, or the body of any veteran of the military service of the United States of America who served during any war, police action, or other period of national emergency, shall not be buried in any portion of any cemetery or burial ground used for the burial of paupers.

